District of Columbia statutes.
2-220.08

Enforcement.

The payment of wages, enforcement of non-payment, and penalties and remedies for non-payment required under this subchapter shall be consistent with and subject to the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 32. Failure to pay wages in conformance with this subchapter shall constitute unpaid wages and shall subject the violator to all procedures, liquidated damages and penalties, and any other remedies or relief applicable under Chapter 13 of Title 32 [§ 32-1301 et seq.].

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 108, 53 DCR 2602
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 2064, 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 2-220.04 and § 2-220.06.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “wages, enforcement of non-payment, and penalties and remedies for non-payment required” for “wages required”; and added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2064 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2064 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 2061 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle G of Title II of the act may be cited as the “Wage Theft Prevention Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.